Utah statutes.
75-7-904.   Duties at inception of trusteeship.
Within a reasonable time after accepting a trusteeship or receiving trust
assets, a trustee shall review the trust assets and make and implement
decisions concerning the retention and disposition of assets, in order to
bring the trust portfolio into compliance with the purposes, terms,
distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust, and with the
requirements of this chapter.
